Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. As the United States celebrates the 250th anniversary of its independence, it is the intent of the legislature to honor English as the language of our national and state founding generations. It is further the intent of the legislature to promote unity, cross-cultural understanding, and patriotism.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 1.20 RCW to read as follows:(1) English is designated as the official language of the state of Washington.(2) The official language is designated as the language of any official public record and any official public meeting.(a) An official public record is any record officially compiled, published, or recorded by the state and any other document or record subject to public inspection and copying under the public records act, chapter 42.56 RCW.(b) An official public meeting is any meeting required to be open under chapter 42.30 RCW.(3) Except as otherwise provided by law, no state agency or political or taxing subdivision of the state may be required to provide any documents, information, literature, or other written materials in any language other than English. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of a language other than English by a state agency or political or taxing subdivision where use of such language is required by state or federal law. Nothing in this section prohibits state agencies or political or taxing subdivisions from: (a) Publishing any official public document or record in languages other than English at their discretion, so long as the document or record is also published in English; or (b) permitting a person who does not speak English to speak or communicate at an official public meeting with the assistance of an interpreter.(4) This section shall not be construed in any way to infringe upon the rights of citizens under the Washington state Constitution or the United States Constitution in the use of language in any private activity. No agency or officer of the state or any political or taxing subdivision of the state may place any restrictions or requirements regarding language usage on any business operating in the private sector other than official documents, forms, submissions, or other communications directed to government agencies and officers, which communications shall be in the official language as recognized in this section.(5) The state of Washington recognizes the importance of establishing and actively promoting English language classes, English language training, or citizenship classes for nonnative speakers. The institutions of higher education and community and technical colleges are encouraged to offer such services and are encouraged to seek the assistance of local political subdivisions, community-based agencies and organizations, migrant worker groups, refugee resettlement programs, schools, churches, and others in making nonnative speakers aware of the availability of such classes and training and ensuring their continuation and expansion.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.--- END ---